Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF2412.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 484.94, is amended to read: 484.94 ATTORNEY ACCESS TO COURT RECORDS. new text begin (a) new text end An attorney who is admitted and licensed to practice law in the state may apply for a Minnesota Government Access account to access electronic court records and documents stored in the Minnesota Court Information System for cases in state district courts. new text begin Minnesota Government Access must provide an account with access rights upon application by an attorney who meets the requirements under this section.new text end new text begin (b) new text end An attorney new text begin employed by a government agency and civil legal services new text end shall deleted text begin be able todeleted text end view and print case documents and information without cost to the attorney.new text begin A private attorney shall pay a fee set by the judicial branch to view and print case documents and information.new text end